Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1448
Commission; rules; purpose.

The commission shall promulgate rules for the withdrawal of funds from a committee account for petty cash expenditures and for keeping records of the withdrawals.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 48.